Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.090

Excavation without a valid excavation confirmation code—Penalty.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

Any excavator who excavates, without a valid excavation confirmation code when required under this chapter, within thirty-five feet of a transmission pipeline is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2005 c 448 s 5.]